Alaska statutes. The Constitution of the State of Alaska
Article XIV Apportionment Schedule

[Repealed by 1998 Ballot Measure No. 3 (1998 Legislative Resolve 74; 20th Legislature’s SCS CSHJR 44(JUD)).]

Redistricting. —

The election districts, senate districts, and descriptions of election districts originally set out in former secs. 1-3 of art. XIV were modified by proclamations of the governor dated December 7, 1961; December 30, 1971 (held unconstitutional in

Egan v. Hammond

, 502 P.2d 856 (Alaska 1972)); June 14, 1974 (modified in

Groh v. Egan

, 526 P.2d 863 (Alaska 1974)); July 24, 1981 (modified February 15, 1984 in response to the decision in

Carpenter v. Hammond

, 667 P.2d 1204 (Alaska), appeal dismissed, 464 U.S. 801, 104 S. Ct. 45, 78 L. Ed. 2d 67 (1983)); September 5, 1991 (held unconstitutional in part and modified for the 1992 elections in

Hickel v. Southeast Conference

, 846 P.2d 38 (Alaska 1992)); March 25, 1994; June 18, 2001 (declared unconstitutional in

In re 2001 Redistricting Cases

, 44 P.3d 141 (Alaska 2002)); and April 25, 2002 (upheld in

In re Redistricting Cases

, 47 P.3d 1089 (Alaska 2002)). Under the April 25, 2002 proclamation, the 40 election districts are:

1
Ketchikan

2
Sitka-Wrangell-Petersberg

3
Juneau-Downtown-Douglas

4
Juneau-Mendenhall Valley

5
Cordova-Southeast Islands

6
Interior Villages

7
Farmers Loop-Steese Highway

8
Denali-University

9
City of Fairbanks

10
Fairbanks-Fort Wainwright

11
North Pole

12
Richardson-Glenn Highways

13
Greater Palmer

14
Greater Wasilla

15
Rural Mat-Su

16
Chugiak-South Mat-Su

17
Eagle River

18
Military

19
Muldoon

20
Mountain View-Wonder Park

21
Baxter Bog

22
University-Airport Heights

23
Downtown-Rogers Park

24
Midtown-Taku

25
East Spenard

26
Turnagain-Inlet View

27
Sand Lake

28
Bayshore-Klatt

29
Campbell-Independence Park

30
Lore-Abbott

31
Huffman-Ocean View

32
Chugach State Park

33
Kenai-Soldotna

34
Rural Kenai

35
Homer-Seward

36
Kodiak

37
Bristol Bay-Aleutians

38
Bethel

39
Bering Straits

40
Arctic

The 20 senate districts under the April 25, 2002 proclamation are:

A
Ketchikan-Sitka-Wrangell-Petersburg

B
Juneau-Downtown-Douglas-Mendenhall Valley

C
Cordova-Southeast Islands-Interior Villages

D
Farmers Loop-Steese Highway-Denali-University

E
City of Fairbanks-Fort Wainwright

F
North Pole-Richardson/Glenn Highways

G
Greater Palmer-Greater Wasilla

H
Rural Mat-Su-Chugiak-South Mat-Su

I
Eagle River-Military

J
Muldoon-Mountain View-Wonder Park

K
Baxter Bog-University-Airport Heights

L
Downtown-Rogers Park-Midtown-Taku

M
East Spenard-Turnagain-Inlet View

N
Sand Lake-Bayshore-Klatt

O
Campbell-Independence Park-Lore-Abbott

P
Huffman-Ocean View-Chugach State Park

Q
Kenai-Soldotna-Rural Kenai

R
Homer-Seward-Kodiak

S
Bristol Bay/Aleutians-Bethel

T
Bering Straits-Arctic

Description of Election Districts.

Under the April 25, 2002 Proclamation, the 40 election districts are as follows:

House District 1-Senate District A:
Ketchikan.

House District 1 includes all uplands and islands bounded by a line beginning at the northernmost point of Coffman Cove City, southeasterly along the city boundary to the western shore of Clarence Strait, south to an intersection with the mouth of Eagle Creek, easterly to the centerline of Clarence Strait, southeasterly along the centerline to a point due west of Lemesurier Point, east to Lemesurier Point, east across Union Bay to Union Point, east across Vixen Inlet to the eastern shore of Ernest Sound, northeasterly along the shore to the head of Santa Anna Inlet, easterly along a nonvisible line to the common boundary of the Wrangell-Petersburg and Prince of Wales-Outer Ketchikan Census Areas, northeasterly along the common census area boundary to Grant Creek, easterly to Burroughs Bay, southerly to Ketchikan Gateway Borough, southerly and westerly along the borough boundary (around Gravina Island) to a point due east of Grindall Island, west to Grindall Island, west along its south shore, west across Grindall Passage to the shore of Kasaan Bay, west along the shore to Kasaan City, north and west around the city boundary to Thorne Bay Road, north along the road to Thorne Bay City, west and south along the city boundary to its southwesternmost point in Kasaan Bay, southwesterly through the water to the centerline of Twelvemile Arm, southwest along the centerline of the arm, to and including Cat Island, west to the mouth of Harris River, west and north to its headwaters, west along a nonvisible line to Black Bear Lake, west following its northern shore to a linking creek to Black Lake, north along a linking creek to an intersection (just south of Big Salt Lake) with Big Salt Road, north to North Island Road, northwest to National Forest Development Road 23, north to National Forest Development Road 30, east to Logjam Creek, north to Sweetwater Lake, north along the lake’s western shore to Barnes Lake, east along the lake’s southern shore to Coffman Cove City, east along the city boundary to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 15,031 and a variance of -4.10%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 2, one senator.

House District 2-Senate District A:
Sitka/Wrangell/Petersburg.

House District 2 includes all islands bounded by a line beginning at the center point of the entrance to Cross Sound, northeast along the centerline of Cross Sound to the northernmost island of the Inian Islands, including all of the Inian Islands, continue to the western shore of Idaho Inlet on Inian Peninsula, south along the shore to the mouth of Trail River, southeast to its headwaters, southeast along a nonvisible line feature to the City and Borough of Sitka, east and south along the borough boundary to a point due west of Tebenkof Bay, east along the centerline of Tebenkof Bay to the mouth of Alecks Creek on Kuiu Island, north to Alecks Lake, north along its southern shore to the northeasternmost tip of the lake, southeast along a nonvisible line to the head of No Name Bay, east along the centerline of the bay to Keku Strait, north along its centerline to a point due west of Tunehean Creek, east to the coast of Kupreanof Island at the creek, north along the coast to the mouth of Keku Creek, east to its headwaters, south along a nonvisible line to the headwaters of Castle River, east to its mouth at Duncan Canal, north along the canal shore to the mouth of Duncan Creek, east to Duncan Canal Portage Trail, east to Coho Creek, east to Kupreanof City, north and east along the city boundary to Petersburg City, south along the city boundary to its southeasternmost point, east to Frederick Sound, south along its centerline to Dry Strait, south along its centerline to the northernmost point of Wrangell City, east along the city boundary to Eastern Passage, south along its centerline to Blake Channel, south along its centerline to the entrance of Bradfield Canal, south across the canal to the southern shore of Ernest Sound, south along the shore to Seward Passage, south to the intersection with House District 1 at the head of Santa Anna Inlet, westerly and northerly along the boundary of House District 1 to Clarence Strait (due east of Eagle Creek), north along its centerline to Snow Passage, northwest along its centerline to Sumner Strait, west and south along its centerline to and around Coronation Island to Chatham Strait, north along its centerline to a point due east of the southernmost point of the City and Borough of Sitka, west to the borough boundary, north along the western borough boundary to its northwesternmost point, north through the Pacific Ocean to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 14,991 and a variance of -4.35%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 1, one senator.

House District 3-Senate District B:
Juneau/Downtown/Douglas.

House District 3 includes the area of the City and Borough of Juneau bounded by a line beginning at a point on the borough boundary south and west of Outer Point, northeasterly through the center line of Stephens Passage and Fritz Cove to the mouth of Mendenhall River, north along its eastern bank to Egan Drive, east to Jordan Creek, north to Jordan Creek Tributary, east to Thunder Mountain Trail and Heintzleman Ridge, northeast along the ridge to Thunder Mountain, continuing east on the ridge to a point just southeast of the headwaters of Steep Creek, northwest along a nonvisible line to Steep Creek, northwesterly to Glacier Spur Road, north to the shore of Mendenhall Lake, east around the lake to the western edge of Mendenhall Glacier, north to Juneau Icefield, follow western bank of Ice field past Eagle, Thiel, and Gilkey glaciers to intersection with City and Borough of Juneau at the Canadian Border, southerly along and around the borough boundary to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 15,203 and a variance of -3.00%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 4, one senator.

House District 4-Senate District B:
Juneau/Mendenhall Valley.

House District 4 includes the area of the City and Borough of Juneau bounded by a line beginning at a point on the northwesternmost corner of the borough boundary, east and south along the borough boundary to its intersection with House District 3, south along the House District 3 boundary to its intersection with the borough boundary south and west of Outer Point, northerly along the borough boundary to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 15,508 and a variance of -1.05%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 3, one senator.

House District 5-Senate District C:
Cordova/Southeast Islands.

House District 5 includes all uplands and islands bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of a point on the northeastern boundary of the Kenai Peninsula Borough and the northern shore of Blackstone Bay, northeast along the bay shore to its intersection with Whittier City, east along the city boundary to the north shore of Blackstone Bay, east along the bay shore to its end at Strong Point, east across the mouth of Passage Canal and continuing on with a Prince William Sound Traverse across the mouths of Port Wells, Lake Bay, Quillian Bay, Esther Passage, Esther Bay, Squaw Bay, Eaglek Bay, Unakwik Inlet, Wells Bay, Fairmount Bay, Eickelberg Bay, Long Channel, Columbia and Heather Bays, and Sawmill Bay to the western boundary of Valdez City, following the city boundary east and north to Lowe River, east along the river to Chugach National Forest, easterly along the forest boundary to the Chugach Alaska Native Regional Corporation (ANRC) boundary, east and south along the ANRC boundary to the City and Borough of Yakutat, east along the northern borough boundary to its southernmost point, and including all of the remaining areas of Southeast Alaska not contained in House Districts 1, 2, 3 or 4. The bounded area is closed by continuing west along the coastal boundary of the City and Borough of Yakutat to its southwesternmost point, following the nautical 3-mile limit to the eastern boundary of Kenai Peninsula Borough, north to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 15,048 and a variance of -3.99%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 6, one senator.

House District 6-Senate District C:
Interior Villages.

House District 6 is bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of the common boundary of the Bering Straits and Yukon Koyukuk Rural Education Attendance Areas (REAAs) and the Northwest Arctic Borough, north along the borough boundary to its intersection with the North Slope Borough, east along the borough boundary to its intersection with the Alaskan/Canadian border, south along the border to the City and Borough of Yakutat, west along the borough boundary to the Ahtna ANRC, west along the ANRC boundary to the Copper River, north along its western bank to Urantina River, north to its headwaters, north along a nonvisible line to the headwaters of Bernard Creek, north to a point east of the intersection of Bernard Creek Trail and an unnamed trail, north along the creek trail to the Richardson Highway, north to Squirrel Creek, west to Trans Alaska Pipeline (TAPs), east to its intersection with a road just south of Pippin Lake, east to Richardson Highway, north to 16APL-3 Road, west to TAPs, north to 19APL-1 Road, east to Richardson Highway, continuing east along a nonvisible line to the Copper River, north along its western bank to the Klutina River, east to the New Richardson Highway, north to the Old Richardson Highway, north to the southern boundary of Tazlina ANVSA, west along the ANVSA boundary to TAPs, north to the Tazlina River, east along its northern shore to a trail that connects with the intersection of Copperville Road and the Old Richardson Highway, north along the highway to the Glenn Highway, west to TAPs, north to its intersection with the Richardson Highway (just west of Sourdough and Haggard Creeks), north to Paxson Lake Campground Road, east along a nonvisible line to TAPs, north to the Richardson Highway (just west of Fielding Lake), north to Fort Greely Military Reservation (just west of Butch Lake), north and east along the military boundary to the Richardson Highway (just north of TAPs Pump Station 9 Access Road), north along the highway to the City of Delta Junction, east and north along the city boundary to Nistler Road, east to Souhrada Road, north to Jack Warren Road, west to Fales Road, north to Clearwater Lake, west along the shore to an unnamed creek connecting to the Tanana River, east along its south bank to the mouth of Clearwater Creek, north across the Tanana River, continuing east along its northern bank to an intersection with the Volkmar River, north along a nonvisible line to Volkmar Lake, west around the lake to its northernmost point, east along a nonvisible line to White Peak, north to the intersection of Goodpaster River and South Fork (Goodpaster River), east along the South Fork to Delta Greely REAA, north along the REAA boundary to Fairbanks North Star Borough, north, west and south around the borough to the Tanana River, west along its southern bank to the City of Nenana, south along the city boundary to FAA Way, south to a sled trail (paralleling George Parks Highway), south to Denali Borough, west and south along the borough boundary to its intersection with Matanuska-Susitna Borough, south along the borough boundary to its intersection with Kenai Peninsula Borough, east along the borough boundary to the midpoint of Cook Inlet, south along the midpoint to its intersection with House District 35, west along the district boundary to the mouth of Drift River, west along the river to Lake Clark National Park and Wilderness Area, west along the park/wilderness boundary to a point due east of Summit Lake, west to and around the lake’s south shore to Tlikakila River, west to Lake and Peninsula Borough, north and west along the borough boundary to the common boundary of Calista and Bristol Bay ANRCs, west along the common boundary to its intersection with the common boundary of Lower Kuskokwim and Kuspuk REAAs, west along the common REAA boundary to the Kuskokwim River, north along its western bank to the City of Lower Kalskag, east along the city boundary to the City of Upper Kalskag, north and west around the city boundary to the Yukon Kuskokwim Portage Trail, north to its intersection with Bethel Census Area, west along the census area boundary to a point south of the headwaters of the Pitnik River, north along the river to a point just south of the Kashunuk River, north to the river, east to Driftwood Slough, east to the Yukon River, east along its southern bank to Atchuelinguk River, east along its northern bank to its headwaters, north along a nonvisible line to the Bering Straits ANRC, east and north to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 14,905 and a variance of -4.90%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 5, one senator.

House District 7-Senate District D:
Farmers Loop/ Steese Highway.

House District 7 is bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of the Chatanika River and Fairbanks North Star Borough, north and east along the borough boundary to a point north of the headwaters of Ottertail creek, west to the Middle Fork Chena River, west to Chena Hot Springs Road, west to Flat Creek, south to Chena River, west to a point northeast of the end of Repp Road, west along a trail to Repp Road, west to Brock Road, north to Whitman Road, west to an unnamed road that intersects an unnamed stream, northwest along the creek to the Chena River, west along its southern bank to the City of Fairbanks, west and north along the city boundary to College Road, west to the City of Fairbanks, west along the city boundary to a point where it departs from Noyes Slough, west along the northern bank of the slough to Sandvik Street, west to University Avenue, north to Farmers Loop, north to Yankovich Road, west to Miller Hill Road, north to the intersection of Goldstream Creek and O’Conner Creek, north along O’Conner Creek to Miller Hill Road, north to Goldstream Road, west to Nugget Loop, west to O’Conner Creek, north to Hattie Creek, north to Old Murphy Dome Road, north along an unnamed trail to Our Creek, north to Chatanika River, west to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 15,494 and a variance of -1.14%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 8, one senator.

House District 8-Senate District D:
Denali/University.

House District 8 is bounded by a line beginning at the southwesternmost point of Denali Borough, northeasterly along the borough boundary to a “Sled Road” (east of George Parks Highway), north to FAA Way, north to the City of Nenana, north along the city boundary to the Tanana River, east along its southern bank to Fairbanks North Star Borough, north along the borough boundary to the Chatanika River, east to Our Creek, south to an unnamed trail, south to Old Murphy Dome Road, east to an unnamed road, west to Hattie Creek, south to O’Conner Creek, south to Nugget Loop, east to Goldstream Road, east to Miller Hill Road, south to O’Conner Creek, south to its intersection with Goldstream Creek, south to Miller Hill Road, south to Yankovich Road, east to Farmers Loop Road, south to University Avenue, south to Sandvik Street, east to Noyes Slough, south along its western bank to the Chena River, east to University Avenue, south to Airport Way, west to Sportsman Way, south to Old Airport Road, west to an access road to Robert Mitchell Expressway, south and east to Peger Road, south to the Tanana River, east along its north bank to the City of Fairbanks, east along the city boundary to the point where it turns northerly (at the common boundary with Fort Wainwright Military Reservation), south along the reservation boundary to its second intersection with the Tanana River, east along the military boundary to the easterly most braid of the Tanana River, south along the easternmost bank to Twentythree Mile Slough, south to Eielson Air Force Base, south along the base boundary to the Tanana River, south along its eastern bank to a point due west of Xantheus Way, west to the river’s western bank, south to Fairbanks North Star Borough, westerly along the borough boundary to Denali Borough, south and west along the borough boundary to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 15,552 and a variance of -0.77%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 7, one senator.

House District 9-Senate District E:
City of Fairbanks.

House District 9 is bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of Airport Way and City of Fairbanks, north along the city boundary to the north shore of Chena River, east to Noyes Slough, north and east along its western shore to the City of Fairbanks, north and east along the city boundary to a point where it departs from College Road, east along College Road to the City of Fairbanks, south along the city boundary to Noyes Slough, east along its northern shore to the Chena River, west across the mouth of the slough, west along the northern shore of Chena River to Cushman Street, south to 30th Avenue, west to Van Horn Road, south to an unnamed creek (just north of Van Horn Court), west along the creek to Shell Street, south to Standard Avenue, west to the City of Fairbanks, north along the city boundary to the Robert Mitchell Expressway, west to an unnamed road, north to Old Airport Road, east to Sportsman Way, north to Airport Way, east to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 15,723 and a variance of -0.32%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 10, one senator.

House District 10-Senate District E:
Fairbanks/Fort Wainwright.

House District 10 is bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of College Road and the City of Fairbanks, east and south along the city boundary to a point on Holmes Road where it turns north to intersect Badger Loop Road, west along the Fort Wainwright Military Reservation boundary to the City of Fairbanks, south and west along the city boundary to a point where it departs north from the Tanana River, west along the north bank of the Tanana River to a point just south of Peger Road, east along an unnamed water feature to Peger Road, north to Standard Avenue, east to Shell Street, north to an unnamed stream, east to its intersection with Van Horn Road, north to 30th Avenue, east to Cushman Street, north to Chena River, east along its northern bank to Noyes Slough, north and west along its eastern bank to the City of Fairbanks, north along the city boundary to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 15,599 and a variance of -0.47%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 9, one senator.

House District 11-Senate District F:
North Pole.

House District 11 is bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of the City of Fairbanks and the Chena River, east along the river’s southern bank to a point just past its intersection with Steele Creek, south along an unnamed stream to Whitman Road, east to Brock Road, south to Repp Road, east to its end, northeast along a trail to its end, continuing northeast along a nonvisible line to the Chena River, east along its southern bank to the Yukon Command Training Site, south along the site’s western boundary to Eielson Air Force Base, south along the base’s western boundary to Twentythree Mile Slough, north to Tanana River, north along the river’s eastern bank to Fort Wainwright Military Reservation, west along the reservation boundary to the western bank of the Tanana River, north along the river’s western bank to a point just south of the common reservation and City of Fairbanks boundary, north along the reservation boundary to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 15,904 and a variance of 1.47%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 12, one senator.

House District 12-Senate District F:
Richardson/Glenn Highways.

House District 12 is bounded by a line beginning at a point on the northern boundary of Matanuska-Susitna Borough where it meets the common Doyon/Ahtna ANRC boundary, east along the borough boundary to the eastern boundary of Denali Borough, north along the Denali Borough boundary to Fairbanks North Star Borough, east along the borough boundary to the Tanana River, north along its western bank to a point due west of Xantheus Way, east to the river’s eastern bank, north to Eielson Air Force Base, north along the base boundary to the Chena River, east to Flat Creek, north to Chena Hot Springs Road, east to a trail which intersects the Chena River and Middle Fork Chena River, east along the Middle Fork Chena River to Ottertail Creek, east and north to Fairbanks North Star Borough, easterly around the borough boundary to the common Delta Greely and Alaska Gateway REAA boundary, south along the common boundary to the South Fork (Goodpaster River), west to Goodpaster River, south from that intersection along a nonvisible line to White Peak, west to Volkmar Lake, south along its eastern shore to the southern tip, south along a nonvisible line to the intersection of the Volkmar River and the Tanana River, west along the northern shore of the Tanana River to a point opposite the mouth of Clearwater Creek, south to the creek mouth, west along the southern shore of the Tanana River to an unnamed creek (connecting to Clearwater Lake), south to and around the lake to Fales Road, south to Jack Warren Road, east to Souhrada Road, south to Nistler Road, west to Delta Junction City, south and west along the city boundary to the Richardson Highway, south to Fort Greely Military Reservation, east and south along the reservation boundary to the Richardson Highway, south to TAPs (just east of Fielding Lake), south along TAPs to a point due east of the intersection of the Richardson Highway and Paxson Lake Campground Road, west along a nonvisible line to Richardson Highway, south along the highway to TAPs (just west of the intersection of Sourdough and Haggard Creeks), south along TAPs to the Glenn Highway, east to Old Richardson Highway, south along the highway to Copperville Road, west from that intersection along an unnamed trail to the Tazlina River, west to TAPs, south along TAPs to the southern boundary of the Tazlina ANVSA, east to Old Richardson Highway, south to New Richardson Highway, south to the Klutina River, east to the Copper River, south along its western bank to a point due east of the intersection of the Richardson Highway and 19APL-1 Road, west along the road to TAPs, south to 16APL-3 Road, east to Richardson Highway, south along the highway to an unnamed road (just south of Pippin Lake), west to TAPs, south to Squirrel Creek, south to Richardson Highway, south to Bernard Creek Trail, south along the trail to Bernard Creek, south to its headwaters, south along a nonvisible line to the headwaters of Uranatina River, south to the Copper River, south along its western bank to Chugach National Forest, west along the forest boundary to Lowe River, west to TAPs, west to the City of Valdez, southerly around the city boundary to the northern shore of Valdez Arm, westerly along a Prince William Sound Traverse across the mouths of Sawmill Bay, Heather and Columbia Bays, Long Channel, Eickelberg Bay, Fairmount Bay, Wells Bay, Unakwik Inlet, Eaglek Bay, Squaw Bay, Esther Bay, Esther Passage, Quillian Bay, Lake Bay, Port Wells and Passage Canal to Strong Point, north along the shore of Passage Canal to the City of Whittier, west to Municipality of Anchorage, north along the municipality boundary to Matanuska-Susitna Borough, west along the borough boundary to Glacier Fork, west to Metal Creek, north to its headwaters, west along a nonvisible line to the headwaters of Carpenter Creek, north to the Matanuska River, west along its northern shore to Palmer-Fishhook Road, west to Werner Road, north to Biscane Drive, east to Monte Carlo Lane, north to Farm Loop Road, west and north to Britchenstrap Drive, north to its end, continuing north along a nonvisible line to Koenen Road, west to Showers Street, south to Crabb Circle, west to Wasilla Creek, north to the end of one of its unnamed tributaries, north along a nonvisible line to the headwaters of Delia Creek, north to Little Susitna River, south to Fishhook Creek, west to Fishhook-Willow Road, west to Bald Mountain Ridge, north and east along the ridge to the Talkeetna Mountains, east to a point due south of the headwaters of Bartholf Creek, north to its intersection with the Kashwitna River, north along a nonvisible line to the headwaters of Sheep Creek, west to its intersection with the Iron Creek Trail, north along the trail to Iron Creek, west to Talkeetna River, east to Cache Creek, west to its headwaters, north along a nonvisible line to the intersection of Chunilna Creek and a foot trail, north along the trail to Old Bur Rec Trail, east to Susitna River, west to Portage Creek, east to Thoroughfare Creek, north to its headwaters, east along a nonvisible line to the headwaters of Crooked Creek, north to the Ahtna ANRC boundary, west and north to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 16,303 and a variance of 4.02%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 11, one senator.

House District 13-Senate District G:
Greater Palmer.

House District 13 is bounded by a line beginning at a point on the Bald Mountain Ridge just opposite the headwaters of Grubstake Gulch, northeasterly along the ridge to Fishhook-Willow Road, east to Fishhook Creek, east to Little Susitna River, north to Delia Creek, south to its headwaters, continuing south along a nonvisible line to a tributary of Wasilla Creek, south to and along Wasilla Creek to Crabb Circle, east to Showers Street, north to its end, east to a path, continuing east to Koenen Road, east to its end, south along a nonvisible line to Britchenstrap Drive, south to Farm Loop, west and south to Corvette Drive, east to Monte Carlo Lane, south to Biscane Drive, west to Werner Road, south to Palmer-Fishhook Road, east to the Matanuska River, south along its western bank to a point due east of the end of Lawalter Road, west to Lawalter Road, west to Outer Springer Loop, south and west to Inner Springer Loop, west to the Alaska Railroad, west to Wasilla Creek, north to George Parks Highway, east to Hyer Road, east to Grantham Road, north to Outer View Drive, north to Portage Drive, west to Glacier Drive, north to Meadow Lane, west to Serrano Drive, north and east to Skip Circle, north to Palmer-Wasilla Highway, west to Luke Street, north to Mayflower Lane, east to Colonial Drive, north to Union Jack Drive, west to Revolutionary Way, east to Freedom Way, north to Windridge Avenue, west to a Portage Trail, north to Cottonwood Lake, west along its shore to a point due south of Blueberry Drive, north to the intersection of Blueberry Drive and Birch Drive, north to Crowberry Drive, east to Cottonwood Loop, north to Aspen Street, west to Alder Drive, north to Estony Hollow Drive, west to Bogard Road, north to Gruman Circle, north to Travel Air Drive, north to a point on the drive just south of its intersection with Sams Drive, west to Anderson Lake, north around the lake’s shore to a point due south of Delta Street, north to Delta Street, east to Shaw’s Drive, north to Charley Drive, north to Charwood Lane, east to Cedarwood Drive, north to Mosswood Drive, west to Sorrelwood Street, north to its end, continuing north along a nonvisible line to the intersection of Wasilla-Fishhook Road and Pamela Drive, west on Pamela Drive to Starwood Drive, west to Windflower Drive, south to Pamela Drive, west to a point on the drive due north of the end of Tanis Road, north along a nonvisible line to the Little Susitna River, easterly along its north bank to an intersection with an unnamed stream (just east of Cols Patton Extended), north along the creek to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 16,231 and a variance of 3.56%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 14, one senator.

House District 14-Senate District G: Greater Wasilla.

House District 14 is bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of Lucile Creek and the western boundary of Wasilla City, north and east along the city boundary to Jacobsen Lake, easterly around the lake to Happy Little Road, east to Seims Street, north to George Parks Highway, west to Stanley Road, north to Machen Road, east to Day Road, north and west to Stanley Road, north to the end of Stanley Road, continuing north along a nonvisible line to intersect an unnamed stream just south of Bruce Lake, east to Church Road, north to Schrock Road, east to Sushana Drive, north to Coal Creek, north to the creek headwaters, continuing north along a nonvisible line to Bald Mountain Ridge, east to a point on the ridge just opposite Grubstake Gulch, south to the headwaters of an unnamed stream, south along the creek to Little Susitna River, west along the northern bank of the river to a point just west of a trail feature extending from Coles Patton Extended Road, south across the river and continuing south along a nonvisible line to Pamela Drive, east to Windflower Drive, north to Starwood Drive, east to Pamela Drive, east to intersect Wasilla-Fishhook Road, due south from the intersection to the end of Sorrelwood Street, south to Mosswood Drive, east to Cedarwood Drive, south to Charwood Lane, west to Charley Drive, south to Shaw’s Drive, west to Delta Street, southwest to intersect Anderson Lake, southerly around the lake to a point opposite the intersection of Travel Air Drive and Sams Drive, east to Travel Air Drive, south to Gruman Circle, south to Bogard Road, south to Estony Hollow Drive, east to Alder Drive, south to Aspen Street, east to Cottonwood Loop, south to Crowberry Drive, west to Blueberry Drive, south to its intersection with Birch Drive and continuing south along a nonvisible line to Cottonwood Lake, west around the lake shore to Portage Trail, south to Windridge Avenue, east to Freedom Way, south to Revolutionary Way, west to Union Jack Drive, east to Colonial Drive, south to Mayflower Lane, west to Luke Street, south to Palmer-Wasilla Highway, east to Skip Circle, south to Serrano Drive, south to Meadow Drive, east to Glacier Drive, south to Portage Drive, east to Outer View Drive, south to Grantham Road, south to Hyer Road, south to George Parks Highway, west to Wasilla Creek, south to the Alaska Railroad, west to Fair-view Loop, south and west to Cotton Drive, north to Wasilla City, west along the city boundary to Cottonwood Creek, west to Edlund Road, north to Knik Goose Bay Road, west to Foothills Boulevard, north to Lucile Creek, east to point of beginning. The house district has a population of 16,119 and a variance of 2.84%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 13, one senator.

House District 15-Senate District H:
Rural Mat-Su.

House District 15 includes all uplands and islands bounded by a line beginning at the northwesternmost corner of the Matanuska-Susitna Borough, easterly along the borough boundary to Doyon ANRC, south and east along the ANRC boundary to Crooked Creek, south to its headwaters, westerly along a nonvisible line to the headwaters of Thoroughfare Creek, south to Portage Creek, west to Susitna River, east along its northern bank to Old Bur Rec Trail, south along a series of unnamed foot trails and a nonvisible line to the headwaters of Cache Creek, east to Talkeetna River, west to Iron Creek, south to Iron Creek Trail, south along the trail to Sheep Creek, east to the creek headwaters, south along a nonvisible line to the intersection of Kashwitna River and Bartholf Creek, south along the creek to its headwaters in the Talkeetna Mountains, westerly through the Talkeetna Mountains to Bald Mountain Ridge, westerly along the ridge to a point by the headwaters of Coal Creek, south along the creek to Sushana Drive, south to Schrock road, west to Church Road, south to its intersection with an unnamed creek (just east of Bruce Lake), west along the creek to a point due north of Stanley Road, south to and along the road to Day Road, east and south to Machen Road, west to Stanley Road, south to George Parks Highway, east to Seims Street, south to Happy Little Road, south to Jacobsen Lake, east along the lake shore to Wasilla City, west along the city boundary to its intersection with Lucile Creek, west to Foothills Boulevard, south to Knik-Goose Bay Road, west to a point due west of Binnacle Drive, south along a trail to the end of Binnacle Drive, continuing south along a nonvisible line to Crocker Creek, west along the creek to Settlers Bay Drive, south to Crocker Creek, south to the mouth of Crocker Creek, south through Knik Arm to the Matanuska-Susitna Borough boundary, west and north to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 16,137 and a variance of 2.96%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 16, one senator.

House District 16-Senate District H:
Chugiak/South Mat-Su.

House District 16 includes all uplands and islands bounded by a line beginning at the mouth of Crocker Creek in the Matanuska-Susitna Borough, north along the creek to Settlers Bay Drive, north to Crocker Creek, east along the creek to a point due south of the end of Binnacle Drive, north along a nonvisible line to the end of Binnacle Drive, continuing north to intersect Knik-Goose Bay Road, east to Edlund Road, south to Cottonwood Creek, east to its intersection with Wasilla City, east and south along the city boundary to Cotton Drive, south to Fairview Loop, east to the Alaska Railroad, east and north to Inner Springer Loop, east to Outer Springer Loop, east and north to Lawalter Road, east to the road’s end, continuing east along a nonvisible extension to Matanuska River, north and east along the western river bank to Carpenter Creek, south to the midpoint of a nonvisible line between a mountain peak called ‘Glacier 7190’ and the headwaters of Metal Creek, east along the nonvisible line to Metal Creek, south along the creek to Glacier Fork, east to the Municipality of Anchorage, south along the municipality boundary to the common boundary of Lake George National Natural Landmark and Chugach National Forest, west along the forest boundary to a natural ridge line running along the Eagle Glacier, north to Whiteout Glacier, continuing northwest to Peril Peak, northwest to the headwaters of Peters Creek, north to a point on the creek due east of Mount Magnificent, west along a nonvisible line to Mount Magnificent, west to the headwaters of Meadow Creek, west to Chugach State Park, north along the park boundary to Carol Creek, west to Savage Drive, north to Fish Hatchery Road, west to Old Glenn Highway, east to Lake Ridge Drive, north to Caspian Court, east to Darby Road, east to Old Glenn Highway, north to Birchwood Loop Road, west to on-ramp of New Glenn Highway, continuing north along the highway to Parks Creek, north to Mink Creek, west to Werre Street, north to Richner Road, west to Mink Creek, north to Fire Creek, north to the creek mouth at Knik Arm, north through the waters of Knik Arm to the common boundary of the Municipality of Anchorage and the Matanuska-Susitna Borough, north to point of beginning. The house district has a population of 16,104 and a variance of 2.75%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 15, one senator.

House District 17-Senate District I:
Eagle River.

House District 17 is bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of the New Glenn Highway and Eagle River Access Road, east along the access road to Carol Creek, east to Chugach State Park, westerly and southerly along the park boundary to Steeple Drive, south to Eagle River Lane, south to the lane’s end, continuing south along a nonvisible line to the eastern end of Highland Ridge Drive, west and south to Driftwood Bay Drive, west to Eagle Loop Road, south to Eagle River, west along its north bank to Fort Richardson Military Base, north along the base boundary to a point due west of the intersection of Breckenridge Drive and Farm Avenue, east to the New Glenn Highway, east to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 15,819 and a variance of 0.93%. The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 18, one senator.

House District 18-Senate District I:
Military.
